North Carolina statutes. Chapter 55. North Carolina Business Corporation Act.
Part 6. Ratification of Defective Corporate Actions.

§ 55-1-60.
Definitions.

In this Part, the following definitions apply:

Corporate action. — Any action taken by or on behalf of the corporation, including any action taken by the incorporator, the board of directors, a committee, a subcommittee, an officer or agent of the corporation, or the shareholders.

Date of the defective corporate action. — The date the defective corporate action was purported to have been taken or, if the exact date is unknown, the approximate date thereof.

Defective corporate action. — Any corporate action purportedly taken that is, and at the time the corporate action was purportedly taken would have been, within the power of the corporation, but is void or voidable due to a failure of authorization. This term includes an overissue. This term does not include a business combination subject to

G.S. 55-9-02

, unless the business combination was approved by shareholders in accordance with

G.S. 55-9-02

.

Failure of authorization. — The (i) failure to authorize, approve, or otherwise effect a corporate action in compliance with the provisions of this Chapter, the articles of incorporation or bylaws of the corporation, a corporate resolution, or any plan or agreement to which the corporation is a party, if and to the extent the failure would render the corporate action void or voidable, or (ii) failure of the board of directors or any officer of the corporation to authorize or approve any act or transaction taken by or on behalf of the corporation that would have required for its due authorization the approval of the board of directors or the officer.

Overissue. — The purported issuance of either of the following:

Shares of a class or series in excess of the number of shares of a class or series the corporation has the power to issue under

G.S. 55-6-01

at the time of the issuance.

Shares of any class or series that is not then authorized for issuance by the articles of incorporation.

Putative shares. — The shares of any class or series of the corporation, including shares issued upon exercise of rights, options, warrants, or other securities convertible into shares of the corporation, or interests with respect thereto, that were created or issued as a result of a defective corporate action, and that satisfy either of the following conditions:

Would constitute valid shares but for any failure of authorization.

Cannot be determined by the board of directors to be valid shares.

Valid shares. — The shares of any class or series of the corporation that have been duly authorized and validly issued in accordance with this Chapter, including as a result of ratification or validation under this Part.

Validation effective time. — With respect to any defective corporate action ratified under this Part, means the later of (i) the time at which the ratification of the defective corporate action is approved by the shareholders, or if approval of shareholders is not required, the time at which the notice required by

G.S. 55-1-64

becomes effective in accordance with

G.S. 55-1-41

or (ii) the time at which any articles of validation filed in accordance with

G.S. 55-1-66

become effective. The validation effective time shall not be affected by the filing or pendency of a judicial proceeding in accordance with this Chapter or otherwise, unless otherwise ordered by the court.

History.

2018-45, s. 3.

Official Comment to the Model Business Corporation Act, 2016 Revision

The definitions of “corporate action,” “defective corporate action” and “failure of authorization” are intentionally broad so as to permit ratification of any corporate action purportedly taken that would have been within the power granted to a corporation under the Act.

The term “defective corporate action” includes an “overissue” of shares and other defects in share issuances that could cause shares to be treated as void. For purposes of determining which shares are overissued, only those shares issued in excess of the number of shares permitted to be issued under section 6.01 of the Act would be deemed overissued shares. If it cannot be determined from the records of the corporation which shares were issued before others, all shares included in an issuance that is or results in an overissue would be overissued shares.

§ 55-1-61.
Defective corporate actions.

A defective corporate action is not void or voidable if ratified in accordance with

G.S. 55-1-62

or validated in accordance with

G.S. 55-1-67

.

Ratification under

G.S. 55-1-62

or validation under

G.S. 55-1-67

is not the exclusive means of ratifying or validating any defective corporate action, and the absence or failure of ratification in accordance with this Part does not, of itself, affect the validity or effectiveness of any corporate action properly ratified under common law or otherwise, nor does it create a presumption that the corporate action is or was a defective corporate action or void or voidable.

In the case of an overissue, putative shares shall be valid shares effective as of the date originally issued or purportedly issued upon either of the following:

The effectiveness under this Part and under Article 10 of this Chapter of an amendment to the articles of incorporation authorizing, designating, or creating the shares.

The effectiveness of any other corporate action under this Part ratifying the authorization, designation, or creation of the shares.

History.

2018-45, s. 3.

Official Comment to the Model Business Corporation Act, 2016 Revision

Subchapter E provides a statutory ratification procedure for corporate actions that may not have been properly authorized and shares that may have been improperly issued. The statutory ratification procedure is designed to supplement common law ratification. Corporate actions ratified under this subchapter remain subject to equitable review.

Examples of defective corporate actions subject to ratification include the failure of the incorporator to validly appoint an initial board of directors, corporate action taken in the absence of board resolutions authorizing the action, the failure to obtain the requisite shareholder approval of a corporate action, issuance of shares in the absence of evidence that consideration payable to the corporation for shares was received, the failure to comply with appraisal requirements and the issuance of shares without complying with preemptive rights. The ratification procedure is intended to be available only where there is objective evidence that a corporate action was defectively implemented. For example, subchapter E would permit ratification of shares previously issued but subsequently determined to have been issued improperly. It would not permit the corporation to issue shares retroactively as of an earlier date, however, where there is no objective evidence that those shares had previously been issued. Objective evidence may include resolutions, issuance of share certificates, subscription or share purchase agreements, entries in a share ledger or other correspondence indicating that shares were issued or intended to have been issued.

Section 1.46(a) does not distinguish between void and voidable actions. Instead it provides that any defective corporate action that is ratified in accordance with section 1.47 or validated under section 1.52 shall not be void or voidable. Section 1.47 is not the exclusive means by which a defective corporate action may be ratified. Thus, the general common law doctrine of ratification, as applied to a board of directors’ adoption of actions taken by officers who may not have had the actual authority to take such actions, continues to be an effective mode of ratification. Section 1.46(b) makes clear that the corporation’s ratification of a defective corporate action that is voidable but not void using common law methods of ratification rather than under section 1.47 will not, standing alone, affect the validity of the action or create a presumption that the action is not valid. In addition, ratification under subchapter E is distinct from correction of an already filed document under section 1.24.

Section 1.46(c) provides that an overissue can be remedied by the adoption of articles of amendment or other corporate action that has the effect of authorizing, designating or creating shares of a series or class, such that the putative shares that resulted in the overissue are deemed to be validly issued from the date of original issuance. This provision enables a corporation to cure an overissue occurring when shares have been duly authorized but are issued before articles of amendment are filed. It also permits a corporation to remedy an overissue even if it cannot specifically identify the putative shares.

§ 55-1-62.
Ratification of defective corporate actions.

Except as otherwise provided in subsection (b) of this section, the board of directors shall ratify a defective corporate action by taking action in accordance with

G.S. 55-1-63

that states all of the following:

The defective corporate action to be ratified and, if the defective corporate action involved the issuance of putative shares, the number and type of putative shares purportedly issued.

The date of the defective corporate action.

The nature of the failure of authorization with respect to the defective corporate action to be ratified.

That the board of directors approves the ratification of the defective corporate action.

In the event that a defective corporate action to be ratified relates to the election of the initial board of directors of the corporation under G.S. 55-2-05(a)(2), a majority of the persons who, at the time of the ratification, are exercising the powers of directors may take an action that states all of the following:

The name of the person or persons who first took action in the name of the corporation as the initial board of directors of the corporation.

The earlier of the date on which the person or persons identified under subdivision (1) of this subsection first took the action or were purported to have been elected as the initial board of directors.

That the ratification of the election of the person or persons identified under subdivision (1) of this subsection as the initial board of directors is approved.

If any provision of this Chapter, the articles of incorporation or bylaws, any corporate resolution, or any plan or agreement to which the corporation is a party in effect at the time action under subsection (a) of this section is taken, requires shareholder approval or would have required shareholder approval at the date of the occurrence of the defective corporate action, the ratification of the defective corporate action approved in the action taken by the directors under subsection (a) of this section shall be submitted to the shareholders for approval in accordance with

G.S. 55-1-63

.

Unless otherwise provided in the action taken by the board of directors under subsection (a) of this section, after the action by the board of directors has been taken and, if required, approved by the shareholders, the board of directors may abandon the ratification at any time prior to the validation effective time without further action of the shareholders.

History.

2018-45, s. 3.

Official Comment to the Model Business Corporation Act, 2016 Revision

The information required by section 1.47(a)(1)(a)(1) regarding the listing of putative shares may be satisfied by attaching a table, including a capitalization table, listing the putative shares. Section 1.47(b) permits the ratification of the initial election of the board of directors by the persons who are acting as the current board of directors, recognizing that if the corporation’s initial board of directors was defectively appointed, there may be no effective method of ratification because a duly elected board of directors does not exist.

§ 55-1-63.
Action on ratification.

The quorum and voting requirements applicable to a ratifying action by the board of directors under G.S. 55-1-62(a) are the quorum and voting requirements applicable to the corporate action proposed to be ratified at the time the ratifying action is taken.

If the ratification of the defective corporate action requires approval by the shareholders under

G.S. 55-1-62

(c), and, if the approval is to be given at a meeting, the corporation shall notify each holder of valid and putative shares, whether or not entitled to vote, as of the record date for notice of the meeting and as of the date of the occurrence of the defective corporate action, provided that notice shall not be required to be given to holders of valid or putative shares whose identities or addresses for notice cannot be determined from the records of the corporation. The notice shall state that the purpose, or one of the purposes, of the meeting is to consider ratification of a defective corporate action and shall be accompanied by (i) a copy of the action taken by the board of directors in accordance with

G.S. 55-1-62

(a) or (ii) the information required by subdivisions (1) through (4) of subsection (a) of G.S. 55-1-62. The notice shall also include a statement that any claim that the ratification of the defective corporate action and any putative shares issued as a result of the defective corporate action should not be effective, or should be effective only on certain conditions, shall be brought within 120 days from the applicable validation effective time.

Except as provided in subsection (d) of this section with respect to the voting requirements to ratify the election of a director, the quorum and voting requirements applicable to the approval by the shareholders required by G.S. 55-1-62(c) are the quorum and voting requirements applicable to the corporate action proposed to be ratified at the time of the shareholder approval.

The approval by shareholders to ratify the election of a director requires that the votes cast within the voting group favoring the ratification of the election exceed the votes cast opposing the ratification of the election at a meeting at which a quorum is present.

Putative shares on the record date for determining the shareholders entitled to vote on any matter submitted to shareholders under G.S. 55-1-62(c), and without giving effect to any ratification of putative shares that becomes effective as a result of the vote, shall neither be entitled to vote nor counted for quorum purposes in any vote to approve the ratification of any defective corporate action.

If the approval under this section of putative shares would result in an overissue, in addition to the approval required by

G.S. 55-1-62

, approval of an amendment to the articles of incorporation under Article 10 of this Chapter to increase the number of shares of an authorized class or series, or to authorize the creation of a class or series of shares so there would be no overissue, shall also be required.

History.

2018-45, s. 3.

Official Comment to the Model Business Corporation Act, 2016 Revision

Notwithstanding the shareholder notice required by section 1.48(b), only valid shares are entitled to vote on the ratification action or counted for quorum purposes. The retroactive effect of a ratification of putative shares does not invalidate the quorum or voting result of the ratification.

For matters other than the election of directors, the quorum and voting requirements applicable to shareholder approval of ratification are the quorum and voting requirements applicable to the corporate action being ratified at the time of such approval. For example, if the defective corporate action being ratified is an amendment to the articles of incorporation, whether in connection with an overissue or otherwise, the vote required would be governed by section 10.03. If the defective corporate action involves a merger, the vote required would be the vote required by section 11.04.

§ 55-1-64.
Notice requirements.

Unless shareholder approval is required under

G.S. 55-1-62

(c), prompt notice of an action taken under

G.S. 55-1-62

shall be given to each holder of valid and putative shares, whether or not entitled to vote, as of (i) the date of the action by the board of directors and (ii) the date of the defective corporate action ratified, provided that notice shall not be required to be given to holders of valid and putative shares whose identities or addresses for notice cannot be determined from the records of the corporation.

The notice required under subsection (a) of this section shall contain (i) a copy of the action taken by the board of directors in accordance with subsection (a) or (b) of

G.S. 55-1-62

or (ii) the information required by subdivisions (1) through (4) of subsection (a) of

G.S. 55-1-62

or subdivisions (1) through (3) of subsection (b) of G.S. 55-1-62, as applicable. The notice shall also include a statement that any claim that the ratification of the defective corporate action and any putative shares issued as a result of the defective corporate action should not be effective, or should be effective only on certain conditions, shall be brought within 120 days from the applicable validation effective time.

No notice under this section is required with respect to any action required to be submitted to shareholders for approval under G.S. 55-1-62(c) if notice is given in accordance with G.S. 55-1-63(b).

A notice required by this section may be given in any manner permitted by

G.S. 55-1-41

and, for any public corporation, may be given by means of a filing or furnishing of the notice with the Securities and Exchange Commission which becomes publicly accessible on the Web site of the Securities and Exchange Commission approximately contemporaneously with the filing or furnishing.

History.

2018-45, s. 3.

§ 55-1-65.
Effect of ratification.

Ratification in accordance with this Part shall have the following effects from and after the validation effective time, and without regard to the 120-day period during which a claim may be brought under

G.S. 55-1-67

:

Each defective corporate action ratified in accordance with

G.S. 55-1-62

is not void or voidable as a result of the failure of authorization identified in the action taken under subsection (a) or (b) of

G.S. 55-1-62

and is a valid corporate action effective as of the date of the defective corporate action.

The issuance of each putative share or fraction of a putative share purportedly issued pursuant to a defective corporate action identified in the action taken under

G.S. 55-1-62

is not void or voidable, and the putative share or fraction of the putative share is an identical share or fraction of a valid share as of the time it was purportedly issued.

Any corporate action taken subsequent to the defective corporate action ratified in accordance with this Part in reliance on the defective corporate action having been validly effected and any subsequent defective corporate action resulting directly or indirectly from the original defective corporate action shall be valid as of the time taken.

History.

2018-45, s. 3.

Official Comment to the Model Business Corporation Act, 2016 Revision

Ratification is effective as of the validation effective time and is not dependent on the expiration of the 120-day time period in which an action challenging the ratification must be brought. The ratification of a defective corporate action has the additional effect of ratifying corporate actions that are defective as a result of the original defective corporate action. For example, an overissue which results in subsequent director elections being invalid calls into question all actions by the invalidly elected board members. The ratification of the overissue, however, would cure any such additional defects.

§ 55-1-66.
Filings.

If the defective corporate action ratified under this Part would have required under any other section of this Chapter a filing in accordance with this Chapter, then, whether or not a filing was previously made in respect of the defective corporate action and in lieu of a filing otherwise required by this Chapter, the corporation shall file articles of validation in accordance with this section, and the articles of validation shall serve to amend or substitute for any other filing with respect to the defective corporate action required by this Chapter.

The articles of validation shall set forth all of the following:

The defective corporate action that is the subject of the articles of validation, including, in the case of any defective corporate action involving the issuance of putative shares, the number and type of putative shares issued and the date or dates upon which the putative shares were purported to have been issued.

The date of the defective corporate action.

The nature of the failure of authorization in respect of the defective corporate action.

A statement that the defective corporate action was ratified in accordance with

G.S. 55-1-62

, including the date on which the board of directors ratified the defective corporate action and the date, if any, on which the shareholders approved the ratification of the defective corporate action.

The information required by subsection (c) of this section.

The articles of validation shall also contain all of the following information that is applicable:

If a filing was previously made in respect of the defective corporate action and no changes to the filing are required to give effect to the ratification of the defective corporate action in accordance with

G.S. 55-1-62

, the articles of validation shall set forth (i) the name, title, and filing date of the filing previously made and any articles of correction thereto and (ii) a statement that a copy of the filing previously made, together with any articles of correction thereto, is attached as an exhibit to the articles of validation.

If a filing was previously made in respect of the defective corporate action and the filing requires any change to give effect to the ratification of the defective corporate action in accordance with

G.S. 55-1-62

, the articles of validation shall set forth (i) the name, title, and filing date of the filing previously made and any articles of correction thereto, (ii) a statement that a filing containing all of the information required to be included under the applicable section or sections of this Chapter to give effect to the defective corporate action is attached as an exhibit to the articles of validation, and (iii) the date and time that the filing is deemed to have become effective.

If a filing was not previously made in respect of the defective corporate action and the defective corporate action ratified under G.S. 55-1-62 would have required a filing under any other section of this Chapter, the articles of validation shall set forth (i) a statement that a filing containing all of the information required to be included under the applicable section or sections of this Chapter to give effect to the defective corporate action is attached as an exhibit to the articles of validation and (ii) the date and time that the filing is deemed to have become effective.

History.

2018-45, s. 3.

Official Comment to the Model Business Corporation Act, 2016 Revision

Section 1.51 requires that in the event any filing is or would have been required under the Act to effect the defective corporate action, such filing (if no filing was previously made), such corrected filing (if correction to a previous filing is required), or such original filing (if no correction to a previous filing is required) be attached as an exhibit to the articles of validation. This is intended to provide a clear public record of the actions relating to the ratification.

§ 55-1-67.
Judicial proceedings regarding validity of corporate actions.

Upon application to the Superior Court Division of the General Court of Justice by the corporation, any successor entity to the corporation, a director of the corporation, any shareholder, beneficial shareholder, or unrestricted voting trust beneficial owner of the corporation, including any shareholder, beneficial shareholder, or unrestricted voting trust beneficial owner as of the date of the defective corporate action ratified under

G.S. 55-1-62

, or any other person claiming to be substantially and adversely affected by a ratification under

G.S. 55-1-62

, the appropriate court of the county where the corporation’s principal office, or, if none, its registered office, in this State is located, or, if the legal action is designated a mandatory complex business case pursuant to

G.S. 7A-45.4

, the Business Court, may do all of the following:

Determine the validity and effectiveness of any corporate action or defective corporate action.

Determine the validity and effectiveness of any ratification under G.S. 55-1-62.

Determine the validity of any putative shares.

In connection with an action under this section, the court may make findings or orders and take into account any factors or considerations that it deems proper under the circumstances.

Service of process of the application under subsection (a) of this section on the corporation may be made in any manner provided by State law or by rule of the applicable court for service on the corporation, and no other party need be joined in order for the court to adjudicate the matter. In an action filed by the corporation, the court may require that notice of the action be provided to other persons specified by the court and permit the other persons to intervene in the action.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this section or otherwise under applicable law, any action asserting that the ratification of any defective corporate action and any putative shares issued as a result of the defective corporate action should not be effective, or should be effective only on certain conditions, shall be brought within 120 days of the validation effective time.

History.

2018-45, s. 3.

Official Comment to the Model Business Corporation Act, 2016 Revision

Section 1.52 confers plenary jurisdiction on a designated court to hear and determine claims regarding the validity of any corporate action or any shares, rights, options or warrants. The court’s jurisdiction is not limited to reviewing corporate actions ratified or purportedly ratified under section 1.47, and includes the ability of a corporation or other permitted person to obtain a declaration regarding the validity of any corporate actions or shares that are potentially defective. In determining the validity of a corporate action or reviewing a corporate action ratified under section 1.47, the court may consider any factors or considerations it deems proper under the circumstances. These might include whether the person originally taking the defective corporate action believed that the action complied with corporate requirements, whether the corporation and board of directors has treated the defective corporate action as a valid action, whether any person has acted in reliance on the public record that such defective corporate action was valid and whether any person will be or was harmed by the ratification of the defective corporate action or will be harmed by the failure to ratify or validate the defective corporate action.